Florida, session 2026, SB1304.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraph (h) of subsection (2), subsection (3), 15 and paragraph (d) of subsection (8) of section 121.0515, Florida 16 Statutes, are amended to read: 17 121.0515âSpecial Risk Class.â 18 (2)âMEMBERSHIP.â 19 (h)âEffective August 1, 2008, âspecial risk memberâ 20 includes any member who meets the special criteria for continued 21 membership set forth in paragraph (3)(k) (3)(j). 22 (3)âCRITERIA.âA member, to be designated as a special risk 23 member, must meet the following criteria: 24 (a)âEffective October 1, 1978, the member must be employed 25 as a law enforcement officer and be certified, or required to be 26 certified, in compliance with s. 943.1395, except that; however, 27 sheriffs and elected police chiefs are not required to be 28 certified excluded from meeting the certification requirements 29 of this paragraph. In addition, the memberâs duties and 30 responsibilities must include the pursuit, apprehension, and 31 arrest of law violators or suspected law violators; or as of 32 July 1, 1982, the member must be an active member of a bomb 33 disposal unit whose primary responsibility is the location, 34 handling, and disposal of explosive devices; or the member must 35 be the supervisor or command officer of a member or members who 36 have such responsibilities. Administrative support personnel, 37 including, but not limited to, those whose primary duties and 38 responsibilities are in accounting, purchasing, legal, and 39 personnel, are not included; 40 (b)âEffective October 1, 1978, the member must be employed 41 as a firefighter and be certified, or required to be certified, 42 in compliance with s. 633.408 and be employed solely within the 43 fire department of a local government employer or an agency of 44 state government with firefighting responsibilities. In 45 addition, the memberâs duties and responsibilities must include 46 on-the-scene fighting of fires; as of October 1, 2001, fire 47 prevention or firefighter training; as of October 1, 2001, 48 direct supervision of firefighting units, fire prevention, or 49 firefighter training; or as of July 1, 2001, aerial firefighting 50 surveillance performed by fixed-wing aircraft pilots employed by 51 the Florida Forest Service of the Department of Agriculture and 52 Consumer Services; or the member must be the supervisor or 53 command officer of a member or members who have such 54 responsibilities. Administrative support personnel, including, 55 but not limited to, those whose primary duties and 56 responsibilities are in accounting, purchasing, legal, and 57 personnel, are not included. All periods of creditable service 58 in fire prevention or firefighter training, or as the supervisor 59 or command officer of a member or members who have such 60 responsibilities, and for which the employer paid the special 61 risk contribution rate, are included; 62 (c)âEffective October 1, 1978, the member must be employed 63 as a correctional officer and be certified, or required to be 64 certified, in compliance with s. 943.1395. In addition, the 65 memberâs primary duties and responsibilities must be the 66 custody, and physical restraint if when necessary, of prisoners 67 or inmates within a prison, jail, or other criminal detention 68 facility, or while on work detail outside the facility, or while 69 being transported; or as of July 1, 1984, the member must be the 70 supervisor or command officer of a member or members who have 71 such responsibilities. Administrative support personnel, 72 including, but not limited to, those whose primary duties and 73 responsibilities are in accounting, purchasing, legal, and 74 personnel, are not included; however, wardens and assistant 75 wardens, as defined by rule, are included; 76 (d)âEffective October 1, 1999, the member must be employed 77 by a licensed Advance Life Support (ALS) or Basic Life Support 78 (BLS) employer as an emergency medical technician or a paramedic 79 and be certified in compliance with s. 401.27. In addition, the 80 memberâs primary duties and responsibilities must include on 81 the-scene emergency medical care or as of October 1, 2001, 82 direct supervision of emergency medical technicians or 83 paramedics, or the member must be the supervisor or command 84 officer of one or more members who have such responsibility. 85 Administrative support personnel, including, but not limited to, 86 those whose primary responsibilities are in accounting, 87 purchasing, legal, and personnel, are not included; 88 (e)âEffective January 1, 2001, the member must be employed 89 as a community-based correctional probation officer and be 90 certified, or required to be certified, in compliance with s. 91 943.1395. In addition, the memberâs primary duties and 92 responsibilities must be the supervised custody, surveillance, 93 control, investigation, and counseling of assigned inmates, 94 probationers, parolees, or community controllees within the 95 community; or the member must be the supervisor of a member or 96 members who have such responsibilities. Administrative support 97 personnel, including, but not limited to, those whose primary 98 duties and responsibilities are in accounting, purchasing, legal 99 services, and personnel management, are not included; however, 100 probation and parole circuit and deputy circuit administrators 101 are included; 102 (f)âEffective January 1, 2001, the member must be employed 103 in one of the following classes and must spend at least 75 104 percent of his or her time performing duties that which involve 105 contact with patients or inmates in a correctional or forensic 106 facility or institution: 107 1.âDietitian (class codes 5203 and 5204); 108 2.âPublic health nutrition consultant (class code 5224); 109 3.âPsychological specialist (class codes 5230 and 5231); 110 4.âPsychologist (class code 5234); 111 5.âSenior psychologist (class codes 5237 and 5238); 112 6.âRegional mental health consultant (class code 5240); 113 7.âPsychological Services DirectorâDCF (class code 5242); 114 8.âPharmacist (class codes 5245 and 5246); 115 9.âSenior pharmacist (class codes 5248 and 5249); 116 10.âDentist (class code 5266); 117 11.âSenior dentist (class code 5269); 118 12.âRegistered nurse (class codes 5290 and 5291); 119 13.âSenior registered nurse (class codes 5292 and 5293); 120 14.âRegistered nurse specialist (class codes 5294 and 121 5295); 122 15.âClinical associate (class codes 5298 and 5299); 123 16.âAdvanced practice registered nurse (class codes 5297 124 and 5300); 125 17.âAdvanced practice registered nurse specialist (class 126 codes 5304 and 5305); 127 18.âRegistered nurse supervisor (class codes 5306 and 128 5307); 129 19.âSenior registered nurse supervisor (class codes 5308 130 and 5309); 131 20.âRegistered nursing consultant (class codes 5312 and 132 5313); 133 21.âQuality management program supervisor (class code 134 5314); 135 22.âExecutive nursing director (class codes 5320 and 5321); 136 23.âSpeech and hearing therapist (class code 5406); or 137 24.âPharmacy manager (class code 5251); 138 (g)âEffective October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2008, the 139 member must be employed by a law enforcement agency or medical 140 examinerâs office in a forensic discipline recognized by the 141 International Association for Identification and must qualify 142 for active membership in the International Association for 143 Identification. The memberâs primary duties and responsibilities 144 must include the collection, examination, preservation, 145 documentation, preparation, or analysis of physical evidence or 146 testimony, or both, or the member must be the direct supervisor, 147 quality management supervisor, or command officer of one or more 148 individuals with such responsibility. Administrative support 149 personnel, including, but not limited to, those whose primary 150 responsibilities are clerical or in accounting, purchasing, 151 legal, and personnel, are not included; 152 (h)âEffective July 1, 2008, the member must be employed by 153 the Department of Law Enforcement in the crime laboratory or by 154 the Department of Financial Services in the forensic laboratory 155 in one of the following classes: 156 1.âForensic technologist (class code 8459); 157 2.âCrime laboratory technician (class code 8461); 158 3.âCrime laboratory analyst (class code 8463); 159 4.âSenior crime laboratory analyst (class code 8464); 160 5.âCrime laboratory analyst supervisor (class code 8466); 161 6.âForensic chief (class code 9602); or 162 7.âForensic services quality manager (class code 9603); 163 (i)âEffective July 1, 2008, the member must be employed by 164 a local government law enforcement agency or medical examinerâs 165 office and must spend at least 65 percent of his or her time 166 performing duties that involve the collection, examination, 167 preservation, documentation, preparation, or analysis of human 168 tissues or fluids or physical evidence having potential 169 biological, chemical, or radiological hazard or contamination, 170 or use chemicals, processes, or materials that may have 171 carcinogenic or health-damaging properties in the analysis of 172 such evidence, or the member must be the direct supervisor of 173 one or more individuals having such responsibility. If a special 174 risk member changes to another position within the same agency, 175 he or she must submit a complete application as provided in 176 paragraph (4)(a); or 177 (j)âEffective July 1, 2026, the member must be employed as 178 a state attorney as defined in s. 542.17(7), the statewide 179 prosecutor as described in s. 16.56, an assistant statewide 180 prosecutor as designated under s. 16.56(3), or a special 181 investigator as defined in s. 27.251. The number of creditable 182 years for full retirement eligibility for such member shall be 183 25 years without penalty; or 184 (k)âThe member must have already qualified for and be 185 actively participating in special risk membership under 186 paragraph (a), paragraph (b), or paragraph (c), must have 187 suffered a qualifying injury as defined in this paragraph, must 188 not be receiving disability retirement benefits as provided in 189 s. 121.091(4), and must satisfy the requirements of this 190 paragraph. 191 1.âThe ability to qualify for the class of membership 192 defined in paragraph (2)(h) occurs when two licensed medical 193 physicians, one of whom is a primary treating physician of the 194 member, certify the existence of the physical injury and medical 195 condition that constitute a qualifying injury as defined in this 196 paragraph and that the member has reached maximum medical 197 improvement after August 1, 2008. The certifications from the 198 licensed medical physicians must include, at a minimum, that the 199 injury to the special risk member has resulted in a physical 200 loss, or loss of use, of at least two of the following: left 201 arm, right arm, left leg, or right leg; and that: 202 a.âThe That this physical loss or loss of use is total and 203 permanent, except if the loss of use is due to a physical injury 204 to the memberâs brain, in which event the loss of use is 205 permanent with at least 75 percent loss of motor function with 206 respect to each arm or leg affected. 207 b.âThe That this physical loss or loss of use renders the 208 member physically unable to perform the essential job functions 209 of his or her special risk position. 210 c.âThat, Notwithstanding the this physical loss or loss of 211 use, the individual can perform the essential job functions 212 required by the memberâs new position, as provided in 213 subparagraph 3. 214 d.âThat Use of artificial limbs is not possible or does not 215 alter the memberâs ability to perform the essential job 216 functions of the memberâs position. 217 e.âThat The physical loss or loss of use is a direct result 218 of a physical injury and not a result of any mental, 219 psychological, or emotional injury. 220 2.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term âqualifying 221 injuryâ means an injury sustained in the line of duty, as 222 certified by the memberâs employing agency, by a special risk 223 member that does not result in total and permanent disability as 224 defined in s. 121.091(4)(b). An injury is a qualifying injury if 225 the injury is a physical injury to the memberâs physical body 226 resulting in a physical loss, or loss of use, of at least two of 227 the following: left arm, right arm, left leg, or right leg. 228 Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an injury 229 that would otherwise qualify as a qualifying injury is not 230 considered a qualifying injury if and when the member ceases 231 employment with the employer for whom he or she was providing 232 special risk services on the date the injury occurred. 233 3.âThe new position, as described in sub-subparagraph 1.c., 234 which that is required for qualification as a special risk 235 member under this paragraph is not required to be a position 236 with essential job functions that entitle an individual to 237 special risk membership. Whether a new position as described in 238 sub-subparagraph 1.c. exists and is available to the special 239 risk member is a decision to be made solely by the employer in 240 accordance with its hiring practices and applicable law. 241 4.âThis paragraph does not grant or create additional 242 rights for any individual to continued employment or to be hired 243 or rehired by his or her employer which that are not already 244 provided within the Florida Statutes, the State Constitution, 245 the Americans with Disabilities Act, if applicable, or any other 246 applicable state or federal law. 247 (8)âSPECIAL RISK ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT CLASS.â 248 (d)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, 249 this subsection does not apply to any special risk member who 250 qualifies for continued membership pursuant to paragraph (3)(k) 251 (3)(j). 252 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 253 121.052, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 254 121.052âMembership class of elected officers.â 255 (2)âMEMBERSHIP.âThe following holders of elective office, 256 hereinafter referred to as âelected officers,â whether assuming 257 elective office by election, reelection, or appointment, are 258 members of the Elected Officersâ Class, except as provided in 259 subsection (3): 260 (a)âAny Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Cabinet officer, 261 legislator, Supreme Court justice, district court of appeal 262 judge, or circuit judge, or state attorney assuming office on or 263 after July 1, 1972. 264 Section 3.âParagraphs (h) and (k) of subsection (1) of 265 section 121.055, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 266 121.055âSenior Management Service Class.âThere is hereby 267 established a separate class of membership within the Florida 268 Retirement System to be known as the âSenior Management Service 269 Class,â which shall become effective February 1, 1987. 270 (1) 271 (h)1.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 3., effective 272 January 1, 1994, participation in the Senior Management Service 273 Class shall be compulsory for the State Courts Administrator and 274 the Deputy State Courts Administrators, the Clerk of the Supreme 275 Court, the Marshal of the Supreme Court, the Executive Director 276 of the Justice Administrative Commission, the capital collateral 277 regional counsel, the clerks of the district courts of appeals, 278 the marshals of the district courts of appeals, and the trial 279 court administrator and the Chief Deputy Court Administrator in 280 each judicial circuit. Effective January 1, 1994, additional 281 positions in the office offices of the state attorney and public 282 defender in each judicial circuit may be designated for 283 inclusion in the Senior Management Service Class of the Florida 284 Retirement System, provided that: 285 a.âPositions to be included in the class shall be 286 designated by the state attorney or public defender, as 287 appropriate. Notice of intent to designate positions for 288 inclusion in the class shall be published for at least 2 289 consecutive weeks on a publicly accessible website as provided 290 in s. 50.0311 or, if published in print, once a week for 2 291 consecutive weeks in a newspaper qualified under chapter 50 in 292 the county or counties affected. 293 b.âOne nonelective full-time position may be designated for 294 each state attorney and public defender reporting to the 295 Department of Management Services; for agencies with 200 or more 296 regularly established positions under the state attorney or 297 public defender, additional nonelective full-time positions may 298 be designated, not to exceed 0.5 percent of the regularly 299 established positions within the agency. 300 c.âEach position added to the class must be a managerial or 301 policymaking position filled by an employee who serves at the 302 pleasure of the state attorney or public defender without civil 303 service protection, and who: 304 (I)âHeads an organizational unit; or 305 (II)âHas responsibility to effect or recommend personnel, 306 budget, expenditure, or policy decisions in his or her areas of 307 responsibility. 308 2.âParticipation in this class shall be compulsory, except 309 as provided in subparagraph 3., for any judicial employee who 310 holds a position designated for coverage in the Senior 311 Management Service Class, and such participation shall continue 312 until the employee terminates employment in a covered position. 313 Effective January 1, 2001, participation in this class is 314 compulsory for assistant state attorneys, assistant statewide 315 prosecutors, assistant public defenders, and assistant capital 316 collateral regional counsel. Effective January 1, 2002, 317 participation in this class is compulsory for assistant 318 attorneys general. 319 3.âIn lieu of participation in the Senior Management 320 Service Class, such members, excluding assistant state 321 attorneys, assistant public defenders, assistant statewide 322 prosecutors, assistant attorneys general, and assistant capital 323 collateral regional counsel, may participate in the Senior 324 Management Service Optional Annuity Program as established in 325 subsection (6). 326 (k)âAny state attorney or public defender in the Elected 327 Officersâ Class who has creditable service as an assistant state 328 attorney or assistant public defender may upgrade retirement 329 credit for such service in accordance with the provisions of 330 paragraph (j). 331 Section 4.âThe Legislature finds that a proper and 332 legitimate state purpose is served when employees, officers, and 333 retirees of the state and its political subdivisions, and the 334 dependents, survivors, and beneficiaries of such employees, 335 officers, and retirees, are extended the basic protections 336 afforded by governmental retirement systems. These persons must 337 be provided benefits that are fair and adequate and that are 338 managed, administered, and funded in an actuarially sound manner 339 as required by s. 14, Article X of the State Constitution and 340 part VII of chapter 112, Florida Statutes. Therefore, the 341 Legislature determines and declares that this act fulfills an 342 important state interest. 343 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.